California, session 20252026, SB1378.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 51257) is added to Chapter 2 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: Article 4.7. California Excellence in Service Learning Designation Program51257. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Excellence in Service Learning Designation Program.51257.1. For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(a) “Applicant” means a schoolsite or a local educational agency. schoolsite.(b)“Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(c)(b) “Schoolsite” means a publicly funded school serving pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(d)(c) “Service learning” means an educational approach in kindergarten, including transitional kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that intentionally combines meaningful community service activities with instruction and reflection to support pupil progress toward academic and civic engagement learning objectives while meeting societal needs.51257.2. (a) The department shall establish a California Excellence in Service Learning Designation Program in order to publicly recognize and designate schoolsites and local educational agencies that meet certain requirements and signal which schoolsites and local educational agencies demonstrate excellence in service learning.(b) (1) The department shall develop an application process that provides annual opportunities for schoolsites and local educational agencies to earn the California Excellence in Service Learning designation by demonstrating compliance with the application criteria adopted pursuant to paragraph (2).(2) The department shall adopt application criteria for schoolsites and local educational agencies seeking the California Excellence in Service Learning designation. The department shall consider including, as part of the application criteria, a requirement that an applicant do all of the following:(A) Designate a staff member to serve as a point of contact for service learning.(B) Provide professional development opportunities to train staff on service learning.(C) Develop a dedicated web page on the applicant’s internet website with easily accessible information and resources on service learning.(c) (1) Once an applicant is awarded a California Excellence in Service Learning designation, it shall display its active status designation, as identified by the department, on the applicant’s internet website.(2) A California Excellence in Service Learning designation shall be valid for three years, after which an applicant seeking to renew its designation shall reapply pursuant to a renewal process and criteria determined by the department.(3) The department may request additional information to verify if an applicant that has earned a California Excellence in Service Learning designation continues to adhere to the California Excellence in Service Learning designation criteria adopted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).(4) (A) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), if the department finds that an applicant that has earned a California Excellence in Service Learning designation ceases to comply with the criteria adopted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) during the three-year designation period, the applicant shall lose the designation.(B) An applicant that loses the designation pursuant to subparagraph (A) may reapply pursuant to subdivision (b).